Florida, session 2026, SB852.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 16 17 Section 1.âSection 163.31791, Florida Statutes, is created 18 to read: 19 163.31791âFood insecure areas.â 20 (1)âThe Legislature finds that access to affordable, 21 healthy food options, especially fresh fruits and vegetables, is 22 restricted due, in part, to the absence of supermarkets located 23 within a convenient traveling distance. This restriction 24 constitutes a threat to the health, safety, and welfare of the 25 residents of this state. Therefore, the Legislature finds that 26 it serves an important public purpose to encourage local 27 governments to grant or approve development permits for land 28 designated as a food insecure area in order to increase the 29 availability of nutrient-dense food options. 30 (2)âAs used in this section, the term: 31 (a)ââFood insecure areaâ is synonymous with âfood desertâ 32 and means a parcel of land that has been identified by the 33 Office of Economic and Demographic Research as being located in 34 an area: 35 1.âHaving a poverty rate of at least 20 percent or having a 36 median family income at or below 80 percent of the median family 37 income for this state; and 38 2.âHaving at least 500 persons, or at least 33 percent of 39 the population, who, in urban communities, live more than 1 mile 40 from a supermarket or who, in rural communities, live more than 41 10 miles from a supermarket. 42 (b)ââNutrient-dense foodâ means a food that has a high 43 level of nutrients in relationship to the number of calories it 44 contains. The term includes fresh fruits and vegetables, whole 45 grains, nuts, seeds, beans and legumes, and low-fat dairy 46 products. 47 (c)ââSmall-footprint grocery storeâ means a grocery store 48 that: 49 1.âSells products at wholesale or retail; 50 2.âDerives at least 30 percent of its gross receipts from 51 the retail sale of nutrient-dense foods; and 52 3.âOperates in a food insecure area. 53 (d)ââSupermarketâ means a grocery store that contains all 54 of the major food departments found in a large retail grocery 55 store. 56 (3)âNotwithstanding any other restrictions, a local 57 government may enact land development regulations authorizing 58 land use for a small-footprint grocery store located in a food 59 insecure area. 60 (4)âNotwithstanding any other restrictions, a local 61 government may include in its comprehensive plan a provision 62 authorizing land use for a small-footprint grocery store located 63 in a food insecure area. 64 (5)âA local government may require mandatory reporting of 65 certain information from small-footprint grocery stores. 66 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.